Hawaii, session 2026, SB1583.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 84, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§84-     Legislators; state equipment; community initiatives.  (a)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or any other law to the contrary, but subject to subsections (b) and (c), a legislator may use state-owned or state-operated equipment, including vehicles, computers, and machines, for any bona fide community initiative; provided that the legislator is trained, qualified, or licensed to use the state-owned or state-operated equipment, if the training, qualification, or licensure is otherwise required by law, rule, or lease contract requirements. (b) Any legislator who purports to use state-owned or state-operated equipment for a bona fide community initiative pursuant to subsection (a), but who actually uses the equipment for any other purpose, shall be subject to this chapter, to the extent applicable. (c)  For the purposes of this section: "Bona fide community initiative" means any activity that: (1)  Is conducted within the electoral district represented by the legislator; (2)  Responds to community needs, promotes civic engagement, or fosters stronger connections among community members; and (3)  Is conducted by an entity that is not: (A)  A for-profit business entity; (B)  Managed or controlled by the legislator; or (C)  An employer of the legislator. "Legislator" means any state senator or state representative who uses or attempts to use state-owned or state‑operated equipment pursuant to this section." SECTION 2. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________